New York, session 2025-2026, A2543.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general obligations law is amended by adding a new 2 section 5-338 to read as follows: 3 § 5-338. Performance of written contracts for benefits in the event of 4 disability. 1. No person, firm, association, corporation or other enti- 5 ty, whether such person or entity be an employer or otherwise, excluding 6 workers' compensation or New York state disability insurance, who enters 7 into a written contract providing for payment of benefits or the waiver 8 of obligations or both in the event of the disability of a named indi- 9 vidual shall, by contract or otherwise, impose on a disabled person 10 onerous or unreasonable conditions for the payment or continued payment 11 of contractual benefits or the waiver or continued waiver of obli- 12 gations. Conditions are "onerous or unreasonable" if by their contin- 13 uous or repetitious nature they require the disabled beneficiary to 14 perform unnecessary or duplicative acts in order to obtain or collect 15 the benefits to which they are otherwise entitled under the contract and 16 include but are not limited to: 17 (a) Requiring the disabled person to undergo unreasonably repetitive 18 medical examinations; or 19 (b) Requiring the disabled person to provide finely-detailed or repe- 20 titious medical documentation of a disabling condition; or 21 (c) Bargaining in bad faith or engaging in any of the acts described 22 in the paragraphs of subsection (a) of section two thousand six hundred 23 one of the insurance law, relating to unfair claim settlement practices. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04437-01-5 A. 2543 2 1 2. Any party to the contract or contract beneficiary injured by an 2 action or failure to act in violation of subdivision one of this section 3 may maintain an action to recover and, upon proof of such injury due to 4 violation of subdivision one of this section by a preponderance of the 5 evidence, shall recover actual damages, including any interest and 6 penalties incurred due to the violation of subdivision one of this 7 section, and reasonable costs and attorney's fees. The court may in its 8 discretion award exemplary damages. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.